Illinois, session 104th, SB3657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Sections 2MMMM and 2NNNN as 6follows: 7    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)8    Sec. 2MMMM. Grocery store coupons.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Digital coupon" means any coupon, rebate, discount, or 11similar instrument offered by a grocery store in an electronic 12format through its website or mobile application, including, 13but not limited to, digital coupons offered pursuant to a 14loyalty or rewards program.15    "Loyalty or rewards program" means any system, program, 16contract, or agreement offered by a grocery store that 17provides benefits to returning customers.18    (b) A grocery store that offers a digital coupon to 19consumers for the purchase of goods shall make available a 20corresponding physical or paper copy of the coupon of equal 21value to consumers upon request. The paper coupons shall be 22easily accessible at the service desk and may also be placed in 23other locations around the store.  SB3657- 2 -LRB104 19464 SPS 32912 b1    (c) Any digital discount price shall be clearly shown 2where goods are displayed or on each individual item offered 3for sale.4    (d) A grocery store shall post a sign or notice at or near 5the checkout register, in a location visible to consumers, 6stating that digital coupons are available in corresponding 7physical or paper copies and will be honored upon request even 8if the consumer has not signed up for the electronic medium 9where the digital coupon was offered.10    (e) This Section does not apply to a grocery store that 11operates exclusively online.12    (f) A grocery store that violates this Section commits an 13unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.  14    (815 ILCS 505/2NNNN new)15    Sec. 2NNNN. Surveillance-based price discrimination 16prohibited.17    (a) As used in this Section:18    "Automated decision system" means any system, software, or 19process, including one derived from machine learning, 20statistics, or other data processing or artificial 21intelligence techniques and excluding passive computing 22infrastructure, that uses computation, the result of which is 23used to assist or replace human decision-making.24    "Behaviors" means an individual's observable, measurable, 25or inferred actions, habits, preferences, interests, or   SB3657- 3 -LRB104 19464 SPS 32912 b1vulnerabilities, including an individual's political, 2personal, or professional affiliations, web browsing history, 3purchase history, financial circumstances, or consumer 4behaviors.5    "Biometric information" means data or information 6generated by the technological, processing, measurement, or 7analysis of a consumer's biological, physical, or behavioral 8characteristics, that can be used for the purpose of uniquely 9identifying an individual. "Biometric information" includes 10fingerprints, voiceprints, scans or records of an eye retina 11or iris, facial maps, facial geometry, facial templates, 12genetic information, or other unique biological, physical, or 13behavioral patterns or characteristics.14    "Individualized" means specific to an individual or group, 15band, class, or tier of individuals with particular personal 16characteristics, behaviors, or biometric information.17    "Personal characteristics" means individual qualities, 18features, attributes, or traits, including immutable 19characteristics, such as race and eye color, mutable 20characteristics, such as address, weight, citizenship, or 21parenthood status, and any other personally identifiable 22information that could be used to identify an individual, 23including social security number, name, or phone number.24    "Surveillance data" means data obtained through 25observation, inference, or surveillance of a consumer or 26employee that is related to personal information, including,   SB3657- 4 -LRB104 19464 SPS 32912 b1but not limited to, personal characteristics, behaviors, or 2biometric information of the individual or group, band, class, 3or tier of individuals of which the individual is a part. 4"Surveillance data" includes information gathered, purchased, 5or otherwise acquired.6    "Surveillance-based price setting" means using an 7automated decision system to offer or inform a customized 8price for a good or service for a specific person or consumer, 9or group of people or consumers, based, in whole or in part, on 10surveillance data.11    (b) A person may not use surveillance-based price setting 12or use surveillance data as part of an automated decision 13system to inform the individualized price assessed to a 14consumer for goods or services.15    (c) This Section does not apply to:16        (1) a difference in price is based solely on 17    reasonable costs associated with providing the good or 18    service to different consumers;19        (2) a discounted price is offered to members of a 20    broadly defined group, including teachers, veterans, 21    senior citizens, or students, based on publicly disclosed 22    eligibility criteria; or23        (3) a discounted price is offered through a loyalty, 24    membership, or rewards program that consumers 25    affirmatively enrolled in, including signing up for a 26    mailing list, registering for promotional communication,   SB3657- 5 -LRB104 19464 SPS 32912 b1    or participating in a promotional event.2    (d) A person that violates this Section commits an 3unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.